Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.908

Transfer of powers, duties, and functions pertaining to the drug prosecution assistance program.

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of commerce pertaining to the drug prosecution assistance program are transferred to the criminal justice training commission. All references to the director or the department of commerce in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the criminal justice training commission when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the criminal justice training commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of commerce in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the criminal justice training commission. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the criminal justice training commission.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of commerce for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 2010, be transferred and credited to the criminal justice training commission.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the department of commerce engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the criminal justice training commission. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the criminal justice training commission to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the criminal justice training commission. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the criminal justice training commission.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of commerce shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2010.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7) All classified employees of the department of commerce assigned to the criminal justice training commission under this section whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the criminal justice training commission shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the criminal justice training commission and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

[ 2010 c 271 s 502.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2010 c 271: See notes following RCW 43.330.005.